District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act of the District of Columbia.”

History

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 120, ch. 222, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-401.
1973 Ed., § 40-417.